Hawaii statutes.
§604-1 Judicial circuits; district judges;
sessions. [(a)] There shall be established in each of the judicial
circuits of the State a district court with the powers and under the conditions
herein set forth, which shall be styled as follows:

(1) For the First Judicial Circuit: The District
Court of the First Circuit.

(2) For the Second Judicial Circuit: The District
Court of the Second Circuit.

(3) For the Third Judicial Circuit: The District
Court of the Third Circuit.

(4) For the Fifth Judicial Circuit: The District
Court of the Fifth Circuit.

[(b)] There shall be appointed one or more
district judges for each judicial circuit. The district court of the first
circuit shall consist of fourteen judges, who shall be styled as first, second,
third, fourth, fifth, sixth, seventh, eighth, ninth, tenth, eleventh, twelfth,
thirteenth, and fourteenth judge, respectively. One of the district judges
shall hear landlord-tenant and small claims matters, provided that when in the
discretion of the chief justice of the supreme court the urgency or volume of
cases so requires, the chief justice may authorize the judge to substitute for
or act in addition to or otherwise in place of any other district judge of the
district court of the first circuit. The district court of the second circuit
shall consist of three judges, who shall be styled as first, second, and third
judge, respectively. The district court of the third circuit shall consist of
three judges, who shall be styled as first, second, and third judge,
respectively. The district court of the fifth circuit shall consist of two
judges who shall be styled as first and second judge, respectively. The chief
justice may designate a judge in each circuit as the administrative judge for
the circuit.

[(c)] The district courts shall hold sessions
at such places in their respective circuits and as often as the respective
district judges deem essential to the promotion of justice. [L 1892, c 57, §8;
am L 1892, c 76, §2; am L 1905, c 61, §1; am L 1909, c 38, §1; am L 1915, c
203, §1; am L 1917, c 224, §1; am L 1919, c 108, §1; RL 1925, §2272; RL 1935,
§3760; am L 1943, c 10, §1 and c 156, §2; RL 1945, §9671; am L 1945, c 80, §1;
am L 1947, c 173, §1; RL 1955, §216-1; am L 1959, c 6, §2; HRS §604-1; am L
1970, c 188, §8; am L 1974, c 114, §1; am L 1976, c 135, §1; am L 1978, c 177,
§2; am L 1979, c 16, §3; am L 1982, c 214, §3; gen ch 1985]

Cross References

As to practice of law by district judges, see §601-8.

See Const. art. VI, §1.

Rules of Court

Divisions of a circuit, see DCRCP rule 3(c), (d).

Case Notes

District magistrate entitled to same judicial immunity as
judge of court of general jurisdiction. 49 H. 624, 631-632, 425 P.2d 1014
(1967).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next